Utah statutes.
16-6a-716.   Greater quorum or voting requirements.

(1)  The articles of incorporation or bylaws may provide for a greater:

(a)  quorum requirement for members or voting groups than is provided for by this chapter; or

(b) voting requirement for members or voting groups than is provided by this chapter.

(2)  An amendment to the articles of incorporation or the bylaws that adds, changes, or deletes a greater quorum or voting requirement shall meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted by the same vote and voting groups required to take action under the greater of the quorum and voting requirements:

(a)  then in effect; or

(b)  proposed to be adopted.

